Washington statutes.
RCW 18.27.300

Representation by attorney, attorney general.

A contractor subject to proceedings under this chapter may appear or be represented by counsel. The department shall be represented by the attorney general in administrative proceedings and any subsequent appeals under this chapter.

[ 1986 c 197 s 7; 1983 1st ex.s. c 2 s 8.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1983 1st ex.s. c 2: See note following RCW 18.27.200.